California, session 20252026, AB615.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25520 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25520. The application shall contain all of the following information and any other information that the commission by regulation may require:(a) A detailed description of the design, construction, and operation of the proposed facility.(b) Safety and reliability information, including, in addition to documentation previously provided pursuant to Section 25511, planned provisions for emergency operations and shutdowns.(c) Available site information, including maps and descriptions of present and proposed development and, as appropriate, geological, aesthetic, ecological, seismic, water supply, population, and load center data, and justification for the particular site proposed.(d) Any other information relating to the design, operation, and siting of the facility that the commission may specify.(e) A description of the facility, the cost of the facility, the fuel to be used, the source of fuel, fuel cost, plant service life and capacity factor, and generating cost per kilowatthour.(f) (1) An emergency response and action plan that incorporates impacts to the surrounding areas in the event of an emergency which would be conducted and coordinated with local emergency management agencies, unified program agencies, and local first response agencies.(2) The emergency response and action plan shall be paid for by the applicant.(g) This section does not alter the authority of the Public Utilities Commission to regulate the rates, services, or safety practices of a public utility or generating asset owner subject to its jurisdiction.SEC. 2. Section 25545.21 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25545.21. In addition to any other information that the commission requires, an application for an energy storage system shall contain all of the following information:(a) An emergency response and action plan that incorporates impacts to the surrounding areas in the event of an emergency that would be conducted and coordinated with local emergency management agencies, unified program agencies, and local first response agencies.(b) The emergency response and action plan shall include analysis and feedback from a local emergency management agency. The local emergency management agency’s feedback may include analysis of whether greater setbacks would be recommended for the proposed facility.(c) The emergency response and action plan shall be paid for by the applicant.(d) This section does not alter the authority of the Public Utilities Commission to regulate the rates, services, or safety practices of a public utility or generating asset owner subject to its jurisdiction.SEC. 3. Section 25545.22 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25545.22. For a facility that meets the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25545 and submits an application after January 1, 2026, the commission shall ensure that the facility complies with setback requirements that are at least as protective as the most recently published edition of the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 855, Standard for the Installation of Stationary Energy Storage Systems.